Hawaii, session 2026, SB1321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 353L-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) The governor shall appoint an oversight coordinator from a list of three nominees submitted by the commission. The oversight coordinator shall be a person qualified by training and experience to administer the Hawaii correctional system oversight commission and shall be well-versed in criminal justice reform and maintain a firm commitment to the correctional system's transition to a rehabilitative and therapeutic model.  The oversight coordinator shall serve a [two-year] four-year term." SECTION 2. Section 353L-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) [In an investigation, the] The oversight coordinator may make inquiries and obtain information as the oversight coordinator thinks fit, enter without notice to inspect the premises of an agency or correctional facility, and, in an investigation, hold private hearings in accordance with chapter 91." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST